Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 73 Arkansas Trust Code
28-73-802. Duty of loyalty.

A trustee shall administer the trust solely in the interests of the beneficiaries.

Subject to the rights of persons dealing with or assisting the trustee as provided in § 28-73-1012, a sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property entered into by the trustee for the trustee's own personal account or which is otherwise affected by a conflict between the trustee's fiduciary and personal interests is voidable by a beneficiary affected by the transaction unless:

the transaction was authorized by the terms of the trust;

the transaction was approved by a court;

the beneficiary did not commence a judicial proceeding within the time allowed by § 28-73-1005;

the beneficiary consented to the trustee's conduct, ratified the transaction, or released the trustee in compliance with § 28-73-1009; or

the transaction involves a contract entered into or claim acquired by the trustee before the person became or contemplated becoming trustee.

A sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property is presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if it is entered into by the trustee with:

the trustee's spouse;

the trustee's descendants, siblings, parents, or their spouses;

an agent or attorney of the trustee; or

a corporation or other person or enterprise in which the trustee, or a person who owns a significant interest in the trustee, has an interest that might affect the trustee's best judgment.

A transaction between a trustee and a beneficiary that does not concern trust property but that occurs during the existence of the trust or while the trustee retains significant influence over the beneficiary and from which the trustee obtains an advantage is voidable by the beneficiary unless the trustee establishes that the transaction was fair to the beneficiary.

A transaction not concerning trust property in which the trustee engages in the trustee's individual capacity involves a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the transaction concerns an opportunity properly belonging to the trust.

An investment by a trustee in securities of an investment company or investment trust to which the trustee, or its affiliate, provides services in a capacity other than as trustee is not presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the investment complies with the prudent investor rule of § 28-73-901 et seq.

The trustee may be compensated by the investment company or investment trust for providing those services out of fees charged to the trust.

If the trustee receives compensation from the investment company or investment trust for providing management services, the trustee shall at least annually notify the persons entitled under § 28-73-813 to receive a copy of the trustee's annual report of the rate and method by which the compensation was determined.

In voting shares of stock or in exercising powers of control over similar interests in other forms of enterprise, the trustee shall act in the best interests of the beneficiaries. If the trust is the sole owner of a corporation or other form of enterprise, the trustee shall elect or appoint directors or other managers who will manage the corporation or enterprise in the best interests of the beneficiaries.

This section does not preclude the following transactions, if fair to the beneficiaries:

an agreement between a trustee and a beneficiary relating to the appointment or compensation of the trustee;

payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee;

a transaction between a trust and another trust, decedent's estate, or conservatorship of which the trustee is a fiduciary or in which a beneficiary has an interest;

a deposit of trust money in a regulated financial service institution operated by the trustee; or

an advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust.

A court may appoint a special fiduciary to make a decision with respect to any proposed transaction that might violate this section if entered into by the trustee.

Subsections (b)-(e) apply only to irrevocable trusts created on or after September 1, 2005, and to revocable trusts which become irrevocable on or after September 1, 2005.

Beneficiary's claims that the trustee converted trust assets, deposited proceeds into her personal accounts, and actively concealed and failed to disclose her dealings with trust assets and investment of proceeds were assertions of breach of trust; therefore, the statute of limitations in the Arkansas Trust Code in §28-73-1005 controlled, rather than the more general three-year tort limitations period in §16-56-105.Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

Appellant beneficiary, who argued that appellees owed a duty of loyalty to her in their administration of a trust, presented issues of material fact to be tried concerning a conflict between a co-trustee's fiduciary and personal interests and how it may have affected his vote preventing appellant from purchasing a 1.5-acre tract adjoining his land. Therefore, summary judgment in this case was inappropriate.Pulliam v. Murphy, 2016 Ark. App. 133, 485 S.W.3d 711 (2016).

Circuit court did not err in refusing to approve the sale of a trust property to one cotrustee where the transaction required a higher level of scrutiny under this section, court approval was required and not just majority agreement, there was conflicting evidence of the property’s value, two cotrustees were interested in purchasing the property and offered differing values, and there was evidence that two cotrustees were trying to exclude the other cotrustee from trust transactions and had not discussed the sale with her before filing the petition.Wylie v. Shaw (In re GNB III Trust), 2019 Ark. App. 171, 574 S.W.3d 159 (2019).

Genuine issues of material fact prevented summary judgment on a shareholder's claim that a bank breached a fiduciary duty where, inter alia, the shareholder alleged that he believed he was placing his individually held stock into a newly created revocable trust to protect his shares from creditors, he asked for help from an attorney who may have represented both the shareholder and the bank at relevant times, and he may not have been fully informed about the implications of the stock-transfer transaction, including the type of trust that was receiving the intended transfer.Ash v. First Nat'l Bank of E. Ark., 2019 Ark. App. 147, 573 S.W.3d 584 (2019).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-803. Impartiality.

If a trust has two (2) or more beneficiaries, the trustee shall act impartially in investing, managing, and distributing the trust property, giving due regard to the beneficiaries' respective interests.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-804. Prudent administration.

A trustee shall administer the trust as a prudent person would, by considering the purposes, terms, distributional requirements, and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-805. Costs of administration.

In administering a trust, the trustee may incur only costs that are reasonable in relation to the trust property, the purposes of the trust, and the skills of the trustee.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-806. Trustee's skills.

A trustee who has special skills or expertise, or is named trustee in reliance upon the trustee's representation that the trustee has special skills or expertise, shall use those special skills or expertise.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-807. Delegation by trustee.

A trustee may delegate duties and powers that a prudent trustee of comparable skills could properly delegate under the circumstances. The trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution in:

selecting an agent;

establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the trust; and

periodically reviewing the agent's actions in order to monitor the agent's performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the trust to exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.

A trustee who complies with subsection (a) is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for an action of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting a delegation of powers or duties from the trustee of a trust that is subject to the law of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of a court of this state.

Publisher's Notes. This section is repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1021, § 4, effective January 1, 2020. For current law, see §28-76-101 et seq.

For text of section effective until January 1, 2020, see the bound volume.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 1021, § 6: Jan. 1, 2020.

J. Andy Marshall, Note: Trust Protectors—Increasing Trust Flexibility and Security While Decreasing Uncertainty of Liabilities for Doing So: How Amending Ark. Code Ann. 28-73-808 to Better Conform With the Modern Trend of Clarifying Trust Protection Could Effectively End the Fiduciary Guessing Game in Arkansas, 35 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 1137 (2013).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-808. Powers to direct. [Repealed effective January 1, 2020.]

28-73-809. Control and protection of trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to take control of and protect the trust property.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-810. Recordkeeping and identification of trust property.

A trustee shall keep adequate records of the administration of the trust.

A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the trustee's own property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), a trustee shall cause the trust property to be designated so that the interest of the trust, to the extent feasible, appears in records maintained by a party other than a trustee or beneficiary.

If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating the respective interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the property of two (2) or more separate trusts.

Beneficiary's claims that the trustee converted trust assets, deposited proceeds into her personal accounts, and actively concealed and failed to disclose her dealings with trust assets and investment of proceeds were assertions of breach of trust; therefore, the statute of limitations in the Arkansas Trust Code in §28-73-1005 controlled, rather than the more general three-year tort limitations period in §16-56-105.Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-811. Enforcement and defense of claims.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to enforce claims of the trust and to defend claims against the trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-812. Collecting trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to compel a former trustee or other person to deliver trust property to the trustee and to redress a breach of trust known to the trustee to have been committed by a former trustee.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-813. Duty to inform and report.

A trustee shall keep the qualified beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed about the administration of the trust and of the material facts necessary for them to protect their interests. Unless unreasonable under the circumstances, a trustee shall promptly respond to a beneficiary's request for information related to the administration of the trust.

A trustee:

upon request of a beneficiary, shall promptly furnish to the beneficiary a copy of the trust instrument;

within sixty (60) days after accepting a trusteeship, shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of the acceptance and of the trustee's name, address, and telephone number; and

within sixty (60) days after the date the trustee acquires knowledge of the creation of an irrevocable trust, or the date the trustee acquires knowledge that a formerly revocable trust has become irrevocable, whether by the death of the settlor or otherwise, shall notify the qualified beneficiaries:

of the trust's existence;

of the identity of the settlor or settlors;

of the right to request a copy of the trust instrument;

of the right to a trustee's report as provided in subsection (c); and

in advance of any change in the method or rate of the trustee's compensation.

A trustee shall send to the distributees or permissible distributees of trust income or principal, and to other qualified or nonqualified beneficiaries who request it, at least annually and at the termination of the trust, a report of the trust property, liabilities, receipts, and disbursements, including the source and amount of the trustee's compensation, a listing of the trust assets and, if feasible, their respective market values.

Upon a vacancy in a trusteeship, unless a cotrustee remains in office, a report must be sent to the qualified beneficiaries by the former trustee.

A personal representative, conservator, or guardian may send the qualified beneficiaries a report on behalf of a deceased or incapacitated trustee.

A beneficiary may waive the right to a trustee's report or other information otherwise required to be furnished under this section. A beneficiary, with respect to future reports and other information, may withdraw a waiver previously given.

Subsections (a)-(c) apply only to an irrevocable trust created on or after September 1, 2005, and to a revocable trust which becomes irrevocable on or after September 1, 2005.

Ark. L. Rev.

Molly S. Magee, Comment: Who Is the Client? Who Has the Privilege?: The Attorney Client Privilege in Trust Relationships in Arkansas, 65 Ark. L. Rev. 637 (2012).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

Trust beneficiaries contended that they were entitled to the detailed billing records of a law firm that represented the bank during its time as trustee. The appellate court ruled that since the beneficiaries were reasonably informed as to what the bank was paying, the appellate court could not say that the circuit court clearly erred in denying the beneficiaries access to the detailed billing invoices. Bell v. Bank of Am., N.A., 2012 Ark. App. 445, 422 S.W.3d 138 (2012).

Material question of fact existed concerning the adequacy of a trustee's reports because the beneficiary argued the reports were inadequate and did not meet the disclosure requirements to trigger the statute of limitations in §28-73-1005, and the trustee disagreed; thus, the circuit court erred in granting summary judgment on statute of limitations grounds, particularly as it recognized that the adequacy of a report is an issue of fact when it denied summary judgment on the question of whether reports supplied by the trustee complied with subdivision (c)(1) of this section.Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

a person other than a settlor who is a beneficiary and trustee of a trust that confers on the trustee a power to make discretionary distributions to or for the trustee's personal benefit may exercise the power only in accordance with an ascertainable standard; and

a trustee may not exercise a power to make discretionary distributions to satisfy a legal obligation of support that the trustee personally owes another person.

a trust if contributions to the trust qualify for the annual exclusion under Section 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on January 1, 2005.

U.S. Code. Sections 2056(B)(5), 2523(e) and 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in (d)(1) and (d)(3), are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 2056(b)(5), 2523(e) and 2503(c), respectively.

all powers over the trust property which an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property;

any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper investment, management, and distribution of the trust property; and

any other powers conferred by this chapter.

The exercise of a power is subject to the fiduciary duties prescribed by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-814. Discretionary powers — Tax savings.

Notwithstanding the breadth of discretion granted to a trustee in the terms of the trust, including the use of such terms as “absolute”, “sole”, or “uncontrolled”, the trustee shall exercise a discretionary power in good faith and in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries.

Subject to subsection (d), and unless the terms of the trust expressly indicate that a rule in this subsection does not apply:

A power whose exercise is limited or prohibited by subsection (b) may be exercised by a majority of the remaining trustees whose exercise of the power is not so limited or prohibited. If the power of all trustees is so limited or prohibited, a court may appoint a special fiduciary with authority to exercise the power.

Subsection (b) does not apply to:

a power held by the settlor's spouse who is the trustee of a trust for which a marital deduction, as defined in Section 2056(b)(5) or Section 2523(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on January 1, 2005, was previously allowed;

any trust during any period that the trust may be revoked or amended by its settlor; or

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-815. General powers of trustee.

A trustee, without authorization by a court, may exercise:

powers conferred by the terms of the trust; and

except as limited by the terms of the trust:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-816. Specific powers of trustee.

Without limiting the authority conferred by §28-73-815, a trustee may:

collect trust property and accept or reject additions to the trust property from a settlor or any other person;

acquire or sell property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale;

exchange, partition, or otherwise change the character of trust property;

deposit trust money in an account in a regulated financial service institution;

borrow money, with or without security, and mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

with respect to an interest in a proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, corporation, or other form of business or enterprise, continue the business or other enterprise and take any action that may be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners, including merging, dissolving, or otherwise changing the form of a business organization or contributing additional capital;

with respect to stocks or other securities, exercise the rights of an absolute owner, including the right to:

vote, or give proxies to vote, with or without power of substitution, or enter into or continue a voting trust agreement;

hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the trust so that title may pass by delivery;

pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable or accruing against the securities and sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; and

deposit the securities with a depositary or other regulated financial service institution;

with respect to an interest in real property, construct, or make ordinary or extraordinary repairs to, alterations to, or improvements in, buildings or other structures, demolish improvements, raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings, subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use or grant public or private easements, and make or vacate plats and adjust boundaries;

enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee, including a lease or other arrangement for exploration and removal of natural resources, with or without the option to purchase or renew, for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

grant an option involving a sale, lease, or other disposition of trust property or acquire an option for the acquisition of property, including an option exercisable beyond the duration of the trust, and exercise an option so acquired;

insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and insure the trustee, the trustee's agents, and beneficiaries against liability arising from the administration of the trust;

abandon or decline to administer property of no value or of insufficient value to justify its collection or continued administration;

with respect to possible liability for violation of environmental law:

inspect or investigate property the trustee holds or has been asked to hold, or property owned or operated by an organization in which the trustee holds or has been asked to hold an interest, for the purpose of determining the application of environmental law with respect to the property;

take action to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or potential violation of any environmental law affecting property held directly or indirectly by the trustee, whether taken before or after the assertion of a claim or the initiation of governmental enforcement;

decline to accept property into trust or disclaim any power with respect to property that is or may be burdened with liability for violation of environmental law;

compromise claims against the trust which may be asserted for an alleged violation of environmental law; and

pay the expense of any inspection, review, abatement, or remedial action to comply with environmental law;

pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or against the trust, and release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the trust;

pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the trustee and of employees and agents of the trust, and other expenses incurred in the administration of the trust;

exercise elections with respect to federal, state, and local taxes;

select a mode of payment under any employee benefit or retirement plan, annuity, or life insurance payable to the trustee, exercise rights thereunder, including exercise of the right to indemnification for expenses and against liabilities, and take appropriate action to collect the proceeds;

make loans out of trust property, including loans to a beneficiary on terms and conditions the trustee considers to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances, and the trustee has a lien on future distributions for repayment of those loans;

pledge trust property to guarantee loans made by others to the beneficiary;

appoint a trustee to act in another jurisdiction with respect to trust property located in the other jurisdiction, confer upon the appointed trustee all of the powers and duties of the appointing trustee, require that the appointed trustee furnish security, and remove any trustee so appointed;

pay an amount distributable to a beneficiary who is under a legal disability or who the trustee reasonably believes is incapacitated, by paying it directly to the beneficiary or applying it for the beneficiary's benefit, or by:

paying it to the beneficiary's conservator or, if the beneficiary does not have a conservator, the beneficiary's guardian;

paying it to the beneficiary's custodian under the Arkansas Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, § 9-26-201 et seq., or custodial trustee under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act, § 28-72-401 et seq., and, for that purpose, creating a custodianship or custodial trust;

if the trustee does not know of a conservator, guardian, custodian, or custodial trustee, paying it to an adult relative or other person having legal or physical care or custody of the beneficiary, to be expended on the beneficiary's behalf; or

managing it as a separate fund on the beneficiary's behalf, subject to the beneficiary's continuing right to withdraw the distribution;

on distribution of trust property or the division or termination of a trust, make distributions in divided or undivided interests, allocate particular assets in proportionate or disproportionate shares, value the trust property for those purposes, and adjust for resulting differences in valuation;

resolve a dispute concerning the interpretation of the trust or its administration by mediation, arbitration, or other procedure for alternative dispute resolution;

prosecute or defend an action, claim, or judicial proceeding in any jurisdiction to protect trust property and the trustee in the performance of the trustee's duties;

sign and deliver contracts and other instruments that are useful to achieve or facilitate the exercise of the trustee's powers; and

on termination of the trust, exercise the powers appropriate to wind up the administration of the trust and distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it.

Trial court did not clearly err in refusing to disturb the assumption that the trustees executed a valid lease of the trust property where they had the power under subdivision (9) of this section and the trust document to enter the lease, and nothing in the record overcame the presumption that the trustees had acted in accordance with their status, even though that status was not disclosed.Preferred Med. Assocs., LLC v. Abraham Family Trust, 2017 Ark. App. 260, 520 S.W.3d 710 (2017).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-817. Distribution upon termination.

Upon termination or partial termination of a trust, the trustee may send to the beneficiaries a proposal for distribution. The right of any beneficiary to object to the proposed distribution terminates if the beneficiary does not notify the trustee of an objection within thirty (30) days after the proposal was sent but only if the proposal informed the beneficiary of the right to object and of the time allowed for objection.

Upon the occurrence of an event terminating or partially terminating a trust, the trustee shall proceed expeditiously to distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it, subject to the right of the trustee to retain a reasonable reserve for the payment of debts, expenses, and taxes.

A release by a beneficiary of a trustee from liability for breach of trust is invalid to the extent:

it was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

the beneficiary, at the time of the release, did not know of the beneficiary's rights or of the material facts relating to the breach.

the expected tax consequences of investment decisions or strategies;

the role that each investment or course of action plays within the overall trust portfolio, which may include financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property, and real property;

the expected total return from income and the appreciation of capital;

other resources of the beneficiaries;

needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation or appreciation of capital; and

an asset's special relationship or special value, if any, to the purposes of the trust or to one (1) or more of the beneficiaries.

A trustee shall make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the investment and management of trust assets.

A trustee may invest in any kind of property or type of investment consistent with the standards of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 9

— Uniform Prudent Investor Act

28-73-901. Prudent investor rule.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a trustee who invests and manages trust assets owes a duty to the beneficiaries of the trust to comply with the prudent investor rule set forth in this subchapter.

The prudent investor rule, a default rule, may be expanded, restricted, eliminated, or otherwise altered by the provisions of a trust. A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary to the extent that the trustee acted in reasonable reliance on the provisions of the trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-902. Standard of care — Portfolio strategy — Risk and return objectives.

A trustee shall invest and manage trust assets as a prudent investor would, by considering the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution.

A trustee's investment and management decisions respecting individual assets must be evaluated not in isolation but in the context of the trust portfolio as a whole and as a part of an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the trust.

Among circumstances that a trustee shall consider in investing and managing trust assets are such of the following as are relevant to the trust or its beneficiaries:

general economic conditions;

the possible effect of inflation or deflation;

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-903. Diversification.

A trustee shall diversify the investments of the trust unless the trustee reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the trust are better served without diversifying.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-904. Duties at inception of trusteeship.

Within a reasonable time after accepting a trusteeship or receiving trust assets, a trustee shall review the trust assets and make and implement decisions concerning the retention and disposition of assets, in order to bring the trust portfolio into compliance with the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust, and with the requirements of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-905. Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with the prudent investor rule is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of a trustee's decision or action and not by hindsight.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-906. Language invoking standard of subchapter.

The following terms or comparable language in the provisions of a trust, unless otherwise limited or modified, authorizes any investment or strategy permitted under this subchapter: “investments permissible by law for investment of trust funds”, “legal investments”, “authorized investments”, “using the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing that persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their capital”, “prudent man rule”, “prudent trustee rule”, “prudent person rule”, and “prudent investor rule”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-907. Application to existing trusts.

This subchapter applies to trusts existing on and created after September 1, 2005.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-908. Uniformity of application and construction.

This subchapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this subchapter among the states enacting it.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 10

— Liability of Trustees and Rights of Persons Dealing With Trustees

28-73-1001. Remedies for breach of trust.

A violation by a trustee of a duty the trustee owes to a beneficiary is a breach of trust.

To remedy a breach of trust that has occurred or may occur, the court may:

compel the trustee to perform the trustee's duties;

enjoin the trustee from committing a breach of trust;

compel the trustee to redress a breach of trust by paying money, restoring property, or other means;

order a trustee to account;

appoint a special fiduciary to take possession of the trust property and administer the trust;

suspend the trustee;

remove the trustee as provided in § 28-73-706;

reduce or deny compensation to the trustee;

subject to § 28-73-1012, void an act of the trustee, impose a lien or a constructive trust on trust property, or trace trust property wrongfully disposed of and recover the property or its proceeds; or

order any other appropriate relief.

To remedy a breach of trust that has occurred or may occur, the court may order a trustee to account; thus, an accounting is a remedy, not a separate cause of action.Dawson v. Stoner-Sellers, 2019 Ark. 410, 591 S.W.3d 299 (2019).

Although the beneficiary's claims nominally sounded in tort, they were predominantly assertions of a breach of trust; therefore, the statute of limitations in the Arkansas Trust Code in §28-73-1005 controlled, rather than the more general three-year tort limitations period in §16-56-105. The beneficiary's allegations clearly involved claims that the trustee breached her duties as trustee in her administration of the trusts.Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

Beneficiary's claims that the trustee converted trust assets, deposited proceeds into her personal accounts, and actively concealed and failed to disclose her dealings with trust assets and investment of proceeds were assertions of breach of trust; by alleging a breach of duty to the trust beneficiaries, the beneficiary necessarily alleged a breach of trust.Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1002. Damages for breach of trust.

A trustee who commits a breach of trust is liable to the beneficiaries affected for the greater of:

the amount required to restore the value of the trust property and trust distributions to what they would have been had the breach not occurred; or

the profit the trustee made by reason of the breach.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if more than one (1) trustee is liable to the beneficiaries for a breach of trust, a trustee is entitled to contribution from the other trustee or trustees. A trustee is not entitled to contribution if the trustee was substantially more at fault than another trustee or if the trustee committed the breach of trust in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries. A trustee who received a benefit from the breach of trust is not entitled to contribution from another trustee to the extent of the benefit received.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1003. Damages in absence of breach.

A trustee is accountable to an affected beneficiary for any profit made by the trustee arising from the administration of the trust, even absent a breach of trust.

Absent a breach of trust, a trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for a loss or depreciation in the value of trust property or for not having made a profit.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1004. Attorney's fees and costs.

In a judicial proceeding involving the administration of a trust, a court, as justice and equity may require, may award costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, to any party, to be paid by another party or from the trust that is the subject of the controversy.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1005. Limitation of action against trustee.

A beneficiary may not commence a proceeding against a trustee for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the beneficiary or a representative of the beneficiary was sent a report that adequately disclosed the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust and informed the beneficiary of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

A report adequately discloses the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary or representative knows of the potential claim or should have inquired into its existence.

If subsection (a) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a beneficiary against a trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within five (5) years after the first to occur of:

the removal, resignation, or death of the trustee;

the termination of the beneficiary's interest in the trust; or

the termination of the trust.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

Although the beneficiary's claims nominally sounded in tort, they were predominantly assertions of a breach of trust; therefore, the statute of limitations in the Arkansas Trust Code controlled, rather than the more general three-year tort limitations period in §16-56-105. The beneficiary's allegations clearly involved claims that the trustee breached her duties as trustee in her administration of the trusts.Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

Beneficiary's claims that the trustee converted trust assets, deposited proceeds into her personal accounts, and actively concealed and failed to disclose her dealings with trust assets and investment of proceeds were assertions of breach of trust; by alleging a breach of duty to the trust beneficiaries, the beneficiary necessarily alleged a breach of trust.Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

One-year limitations period in subsection (a) is triggered only when the trustee sends a report to the beneficiaries that meets the statutory-disclosure requirements, and whether a report meets the statutory-disclosure requirements is a question of fact.Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

Material question of fact existed concerning the adequacy of a trustee's reports because the beneficiary argued the reports were inadequate and did not meet the disclosure requirements to trigger the statute of limitations, and the trustee disagreed; thus, the circuit court erred in granting summary judgment on statute of limitations grounds, particularly as it recognized that the adequacy of a report is an issue of fact when it denied summary judgment on the question of whether reports supplied by the trustee complied with §28-73-813(c)(1).Peck v. Peck, 2019 Ark. App. 190, 575 S.W.3d 137 (2019).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1006. Reliance on trust instrument.

A trustee who acts in reasonable reliance on the terms of the trust as expressed in the trust instrument is not liable to a beneficiary for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-1007. Event affecting administration or distribution.

If the happening of an event, including marriage, divorce, performance of educational requirements, or death, affects the administration or distribution of a trust, a trustee who has exercised reasonable care to ascertain the happening of the event is not liable for a loss resulting from the trustee's lack of knowledge.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.